Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-15,153
Housing agency official; gifts; prohibited acts.

A housing agency official shall not solicit or accept any gift, gratuity, favor, loan, contribution, service, employment, promise of future employment, or other thing of value from any present or prospective employee of the housing agency, any present or prospective contractor, subcontractor, developer, broker, real estate agent, or any other person or organization in connection with the programs, benefits, or business of the housing agency. This section shall not prohibit the acceptance of gifts from relatives or gifts of nominal value which are not given with the intent to influence a housing agency official in the conduct of his or her official duties. Housing agencies may establish standards for determining whether or not a gift is of nominal value.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 82.